Massachusetts, session 194th, S2608.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 93L the
2 following chapter:-
3 Chapter 93M. Massachusetts Data Privacy Act
4 Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings
5 unless the context otherwise requires:
6 “Affiliate”, a legal entity that shares common branding with another legal entity or
7 controls, is controlled by or is under common control with another legal entity; provided,
8 however, that “control” and “controlled” shall mean the: (i) ownership of, or the power to vote,
9 more than 50 per cent of the outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company; (ii)
10 control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors or of individuals exercising
11 similar functions; or (iii) power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a
12 company.
1 of 33

13 “Affirmative consent”, a clear affirmative act, signifying a consumer’s freely given,
14 specific, informed and unambiguous authorization for an act or practice after having been
15 informed, in response to a specific request from a controller; provided, however, that
16 “affirmative consent” shall include a written statement, including by electronic means, or any
17 other unambiguous affirmative action; and provided further, that “affirmative consent” shall not
18 include: (i) acceptance of a general or broad terms of use or similar document that contains
19 descriptions of personal data processing along with other, unrelated information; (ii) hovering
20 over, muting, pausing or closing a given piece of content; or (iii) agreement obtained through the
21 use of dark patterns or deceptive design.
22 “Authenticate”, to use reasonable means to determine that a request to exercise any of the
23 rights afforded under this chapter is being made by, or on behalf of, the consumer who is entitled
24 to exercise such rights with respect to the personal data at issue.
25 “Biometric data”, data generated by automatic measurements of a consumer’s biological
26 characteristics, such as a fingerprint, a voiceprint or vocal biomarker, eye retinas, irises, gait or
27 personally identifying physical movement or patterns, or other unique biological patterns or
28 characteristics that allow or confirm the unique identification of the consumer; provided,
29 however, that “biometric data” shall not include: (i) a digital or physical photograph; (ii) an
30 audio or video recording; or (iii) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph or an
31 audio or video recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific individual.
32 “Business associate”, as defined in the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
33 Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104–191.
34 “Child”, as defined in the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 USC 6501.
2 of 33

35 “Collect”, buying, renting, gathering, obtaining, receiving, accessing or otherwise
36 acquiring personal data by any means.
37 “Consumer”, an individual who is a resident of the commonwealth; provided, however,
38 that “consumer” shall not include an individual acting as an employee, an owner, a director, an
39 officer or a contractor of a company, a partnership, a soler proprietorship, a nonprofit
40 organization or a governmental unit whose communications or transactions with a controller
41 occur only within the context of the individual’s role with such company, partnership, sole
42 proprietorship, nonprofit organization or governmental unit.
43 “Controller”, a person who, alone or jointly with others, determines the purpose and
44 means of collecting or processing personal data.
45 “Covered entity”, as defined in the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
46 of 1996, Pub. L. 104–191.
47 “Dark pattern or deceptive design”, a user interface designed or manipulated with the
48 substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-making or choice, which
49 shall include, but not limited be to, any practice the Federal Trade Commission refers to as a
50 “dark pattern”.
51 “Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer”,
52 decisions that result in access to, or the provision or denial by the controller of, financial or
53 lending services, housing, insurance, education enrollment or opportunity, criminal justice,
54 employment opportunities, health care services or access to essential goods or services.
3 of 33

55 “De-identified data”, data that does not identify and cannot reasonably be used to infer
56 information about, or otherwise be linked to, an identified or identifiable individual, or a device
57 linked to such individual, if the controller that possesses such data: (i) takes reasonable physical,
58 administrative and technical measures to ensure that such data cannot be associated with an
59 individual or be used to re-identify any individual or device that identifies or is linked or
60 reasonably linkable to an individual; and (ii) contractually obligates any recipients of such data
61 to meet the obligations of clause (i).
62 “Genetic information”, any data, regardless of its format, that concerns a consumer’s
63 genetic characteristics, including, but not limited to: (i) raw sequence data that results from the
64 sequencing of the complete, or a portion of the, extracted deoxyribonucleic acid of a consumer;
65 or (ii) genotypic and phenotypic information that results from analyzing raw sequence data
66 described in clause (i).
67 “Gender-affirming health care services”, as defined in section 11I1/2 of chapter 12.
68 “Gender-affirming health data”, any personal data concerning any effort made by a
69 consumer to seek, or a consumer’s receipt of, gender-affirming health care services.
70 “Identified or identifiable individual”, a consumer who can be readily identified, directly
71 or indirectly.
72 “Legally-protected health care activity”, as defined in section 11I1/2 of chapter 12.
73 “Legally-protected health care data”, any personal data concerning any effort made by a
74 consumer to seek, or a consumer’s receipt of, legally-protected health care activity.
75 “Minor”, a consumer who is not more than 18 years of age.
4 of 33

76 “Neural data”, any information that is generated by measuring the activity of an
77 consumer’s central or peripheral nervous system.
78 “Person”, an individual, association, company, limited liability company, corporation,
79 partnership, sole proprietorship, trust or other legal entity.
80 “Personal data”, any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or
81 identifiable consumer; provided, however, that “personal data” shall not include de-identified
82 data or publicly available information.
83 “Precise geolocation data”, information derived from technology or a device, including,
84 but not limited to, latitude and longitude coordinates from global positioning system mechanisms
85 or other similar positional data, that reveals the past or present physical location of a consumer or
86 device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to 1 or more consumers with precision
87 and accuracy within a radius of not more than 1,750 feet; provided, however, that “precise
88 geolocation data” shall not include the content of communications, a photograph or video,
89 metadata associated with a photograph or video that cannot be linked to a consumer.
90 “Process”, any operation or set of operations performed, whether by manual or automated
91 means, on personal data or on sets of personal data, such as the use, storage, disclosure, analysis,
92 deletion or modification of personal data.
93 “Processor”, a person who collects, processes or transfers personal data on behalf of, and
94 at the direction of, a controller or another processor or a federal, state, tribal or local government
95 entity.
5 of 33

96 “Profiling”, any form of processing performed on personal data to evaluate, analyze or
97 predict personal aspects including a consumer’s economic situation, health, personal preferences,
98 interests, reliability, behavior, location or movements.
99 “Protected health information”, as defined in 45 CFR 160.103.
100 “Publicly available information”, information that: (i) is lawfully made available through
101 federal, state or municipal government records or widely distributed media; or (ii) a controller
102 has reasonable basis to believe a consumer has lawfully made available to the general public;
103 provided, however, that “publicly available information” shall not include biometric data.
104 “Reproductive or sexual health care”, any supplies, care and services of a medical,
105 behavioral health, mental health, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic, preventative,
106 rehabilitative or supportive nature relating to pregnancy, contraception, assisted reproduction,
107 miscarriage management, the termination of a pregnancy, a consumer’s reproductive system or
108 sexual well-being, including, but not limited to, any such supplies, care and services rendered or
109 provided concerning: (i) a consumer’s health condition, status, disease, diagnosis, diagnostic test
110 or treatment; (ii) a social, psychological, behavioral or medical intervention; (iii) a surgery or
111 procedure, including, but not limited to, an abortion; (iv) use or purchase of a medication,
112 including, but not limited to, a medication used or purchased for the purposes of an abortion; (v)
113 a bodily function, vital sign or symptom; (vi) a measurement of a bodily function, vital sign or
114 symptom; or (vii) an abortion, including, but not limited to, medical or nonmedical services,
115 products, diagnostics, counseling or follow-up services for an abortion.
116 “Reproductive or sexual health data”, personal data concerning any effort made by a
117 consumer to seek, or a consumer's receipt of, reproductive or sexual health care.
6 of 33

118 “Sale of personal data”, the transfer of personal data in exchange for monetary or other
119 valuable consideration by the controller to a third party; provided, however, that “sale of
120 personal data” shall not include: (i) the disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes
121 the personal data on behalf of the controller if limited to the purposes of the processing; (ii) the
122 disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of providing a product or service
123 affirmatively requested by the consumer; (iii) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an
124 affiliate of the controller; (iv) the disclosure of personal data with the consumer’s affirmative
125 consent, where the consumer affirmatively directs the controller to disclose the personal data or
126 intentionally uses the controller to interact with a third party; (v) the disclosure or transfer or
127 personal data to a third party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other
128 transaction or a proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction, in which the third
129 party assumes control of all or part of the controller’s assets; or (vi) the disclosure of personal
130 data that the consumer: (A) intentionally made available to the general public via a channel of
131 mass media; and (B) did not restrict to a specific audience.
132 “Sensitive data”, personal data that includes: (i) a government-issued identifier,
133 including, but not limited to, a social security number, passport number, state identification card
134 or driver’s license number; provided, however, that “sensitive data” shall not include a
135 government-issued identifier required by law to be displayed in public; (ii) any personal
136 information that describes or reveals a consumer’s mental or physical health condition,
137 diagnosis, disability or treatment, including, but not limited to, gender-affirming health data,
138 reproductive or sexual health data, legally-protected health care data and neural data; (iii)
139 biometric data or genetic information or information derived therefrom; (iv) precise geolocation
140 information; (v) account or device log-in credentials or security or access codes for an account or
7 of 33

141 device; (vi) personal data of a consumer who a controller or processor knows or should have
142 known is a child; (vii) an consumer’s race, color, ethnicity, religion, national origin, citizenship
143 or immigration status; (viii) information revealing consumer’s sex life, sexual orientation or
144 status as transgender or non-binary; or (ix) information that reveals the status of a consumer as a
145 victim of a crime.
146 “Targeted advertising”, displaying advertisements to a consumer where the advertisement
147 is selected based on personal data obtained or inferred from that consumer’s activities over time
148 and across nonaffiliated internet web sites or online applications to predict such consumer’s
149 preferences or interests; provided, however, that “targeted advertising” shall not include: (i)
150 advertisements based on activities within a controller’s own web sites or online applications; (ii)
151 advertisements based on the context of a consumer’s current search query, visit to a web site or
152 online application; (iii) advertisements directed to a consumer in response to the consumer’s
153 request for information or feedback; or (iv) processing personal data solely to measure or report
154 advertising frequency, performance or reach.
155 “Third party”, a person other than the consumer to whom the data pertains, controller,
156 processor or affiliate of the controller or processor of the relevant personal data.
157 “Transfer”, disclose, release, disseminate, make available, license, rent or share personal
158 data to a third party orally, in writing, electronically or by any other means.
159 Section 2. This chapter shall apply to persons that during the preceding calendar year: (i)
160 collected or processed the personal data of not less than 60,000 consumers, excluding personal
161 data controlled or processed solely for the purpose of completing a payment transaction; (ii)
162 collected or processed the personal data of not less than 20,000 consumers and derived not less
8 of 33

163 than 20 per cent of its gross revenue from the sale of personal data; or (iii) collected, processed
164 or transferred reproductive or sexual health data of consumers.
165 Section 3. (a) Notwithstanding section 2, this chapter shall not apply to: (i) a federal,
166 state, tribal, territorial or local government entity, including, but not limited to, a body, authority,
167 board, bureau, commission, district or agency of the commonwealth or of any political
168 subdivision of the commonwealth; (ii) a nonprofit organization established to detect and prevent
169 fraudulent acts in connection with insurance; (iii) a national securities association registered
170 pursuant to section 15A of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules and implementing
171 regulations promulgated thereunder; (iv) a registered futures association designated pursuant to
172 section 17 of the Commodity Exchange Act and the rules and implementing regulations
173 promulgated thereunder; (v) a bank, credit union or any affiliate or subsidiary thereof that: (A) is
174 only and directly engaged in financial activities as described in 12 USC 1843(k); (B) is regulated
175 and examined by the division of banks or an applicable federal bank regulatory agency; and (C)
176 has established a program to comply with all applicable requirements established by the
177 commissioner of banks or the applicable federal bank regulatory agency concerning personal
178 data; (vi) an agent, broker-dealer, investment adviser or investment adviser representative, as
179 defined in section 401 of chapter 110A, who is regulated by the secretary of the commonwealth
180 or the United States Securities and Exchange Commission; and (vii) a covered entity or a
181 covered entity’s business associate that collected or processed the personal data of not more than
182 60,000 consumers.
183 (b) The following information and data shall be exempt from the provisions of this
184 chapter if said information and data are processed, collected or transferred, as applicable, in
185 compliance with relevant federal statutes or regulations, as applicable:
9 of 33

186 (i) protected health information that a covered entity or business associate collects or
187 processes in accordance with, or documents that a covered entity or business associate creates for
188 the purpose of complying with, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
189 Pub. L. 104–191, and the rules and implementing regulations promulgated thereunder;
190 (ii) patient-identifying information for purposes of 42 USC 290dd-2;
191 (iii) identifiable private information for purposes of the federal policy for the protection
192 of human subjects under 45 CFR 46;
193 (iv) identifiable private information that is otherwise information collected as part of
194 human subjects research pursuant to the good clinical practice guidelines issued by the
195 International Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for
196 Human Use;
197 (v) identifiable private information collected or processed for the protection of human
198 subjects under 21 CFR Parts 50 and 56 or personal data used or shared in research, as defined in
199 45 CFR 164.501, that is conducted in accordance with this clause and clauses (iii) and (iv) of this
200 subsection, or other research conducted in accordance with applicable law;
201 (vi) information and documents created for purposes of the Health Care Quality
202 Improvement Act of 1986, 42 USC 11101 et seq.;
203 (vii) patient safety work product for purposes of the Patient Safety and Quality
204 Improvement Act of 2005, 42 USC 299b-21 et seq.;
10 of 33

205 (viii) information derived from any of the health care-related information listed in this
206 subsection that is de-identified in accordance with the requirements for de-identification pursuant
207 to Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104–191;
208 (ix) personal data regulated by Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 USC 6801 et
209 seq.;
210 (x) personal data regulated by the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 USC 2721
211 et seq.;
212 (xi) personal data regulated by the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC
213 1232g et seq.;
214 (xii) any personal information bearing on a consumer’s credit worthiness, credit standing,
215 credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of living collected,
216 processed or transferred by a consumer reporting agency, furnisher or user that provides
217 information for use in a consumer report, and by a user of a consumer report, but only to the
218 extent that such activity is regulated by and authorized under the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15
219 USC 1681 et seq.; and
220 (xiii) data collected, processed or transferred: (A) in the course of a consumer applying
221 to, employed by or acting as an agent or independent contractor of a controller, processor or third
222 party, to the extent that the data are collected and used within the context of that role; (B) as the
223 emergency contact information of a consumer under this chapter used for emergency contact
224 purposes; or (C) that are necessary to retain to administer benefits for another individual relating
225 to the consumer who is the subject of the information under clause (i) of this subsection and used
226 for the purposes of administering such benefits.
11 of 33

227 (c) Controllers and processors that comply with the verifiable parental consent
228 requirements of the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 USC 6501 shall be deemed
229 compliant with any obligation to obtain parental consent pursuant to this chapter.
230 Section 4. (a) A consumer shall have the right to:
231 (i) confirm whether a controller is collecting or processing the consumer’s personal data,
232 including, but not limited to, any inferences about the consumer derived from such personal data,
233 and access such personal data;
234 (ii) obtain from a controller a list of third parties to which the controller has transferred
235 the consumer’s personal data; provided, however, that the attorney general may issue regulations
236 providing for reasonable exemptions or alternatives to this requirement if necessary to protect a
237 controller’s trade secrets;
238 (iii) correct inaccuracies in the consumer’s personal data, taking into account the nature
239 of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of the consumer’s personal data;
240 (iv) delete personal data provided by, or obtained about, the consumer, including personal
241 data the consumer provided to the controller and personal data the controller obtained from
242 another source;
243 (v) obtain a copy of the consumer’s personal data collected or processed by the controller
244 in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the
245 consumer to transmit the data to another controller without hindrance, where the processing is
246 carried out by automated means; and
12 of 33

247 (vi) opt out of the collection and processing of the consumer’s personal data for purposes
248 of: (A) targeted advertising; (B) the sale of personal data; or (C) profiling in furtherance of solely
249 automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer.
250 (b) (1) If a consumer’s personal data is profiled in furtherance of a decision that produces
251 legal or similarly significant effects concerning a consumer, the consumer shall have the right to:
252 (i) question the result of such profiling; (ii) be informed of the reason why the profiling resulted
253 in the decision; (iii) be informed of what actions the consumer might have taken to secure a
254 different decision and the actions that the consumer might take to secure a different decision in
255 the future, where feasible; and (iv) review the consumer’s personal data used in the such
256 profiling.
257 (2) If the decision is determined to have been based upon inaccurate personal data, the
258 consumer shall have the right to have the data corrected and the profiling decision revaluated
259 based upon the corrected data.
260 (c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a controller shall comply with a request
261 by a consumer to exercise rights pursuant to this subsection.
262 (1) A controller shall respond to the consumer without undue delay and not more than 45
263 days after receipt of the request; provided, however, that the controller may extend the response
264 period once by 20 additional days when reasonably necessary, considering the complexity and
265 number of the consumer’s requests; provided further, that the controller informs the consumer of
266 any such extension within the initial 45 day response period and of the reason for the extension.
267 (2) If a controller declines to take action regarding the consumer’s request, the controller
268 shall inform the consumer without undue delay and not more than 45 days after receipt of the
13 of 33

269 request of the justification for declining to take action and instructions for how to appeal the
270 decision.
271 (3) Information provided in response to a consumer request shall be provided by a
272 controller, free of charge, not less than 2 times per consumer per right during any 12-month
273 period; provided; however, that if requests from a consumer are manifestly unfounded, excessive
274 or repetitive, the controller may charge the consumer a reasonable fee to cover the administrative
275 costs of complying with the request or decline to act on the request; provided further, that the
276 controller bears the burden of demonstrating the manifestly unfounded, excessive or repetitive
277 nature of the request.
278 (4) If a controller is unable to authenticate a request to exercise any of the rights afforded
279 under clauses (i) to (v), inclusive, of subsection (a) using commercially reasonable efforts, the
280 controller shall not be required to comply with a request to initiate an action pursuant to this
281 section and shall provide notice to the consumer that the controller is unable to authenticate the
282 request to exercise such right until the consumer provides additional information reasonably
283 necessary to authenticate the consumer and the consumer's request to exercise such right;
284 provided, however, that any such information may not be used for any purposes other than the
285 authentication of such consumer. A controller shall not require authentication to exercise an opt-
286 out request, but a controller may deny an opt-out request if the controller has a good faith,
287 reasonable and documented belief that such request is fraudulent; provided, however, that if a
288 controller denies an opt-out request because the controller believes such request is fraudulent, the
289 controller shall send a notice to the person who made the request disclosing that the controller
290 believes the request is fraudulent, why the controller believes the request is fraudulent and that
14 of 33

291 the controller will not comply with such request; provided further, that if the request was placed
292 through an agent, both the agent and the person who appointed the agent shall receive that notice.
293 (5) A controller that has obtained personal data about a consumer from a source other
294 than the consumer shall be deemed in compliance with a consumer’s request to delete such data
295 pursuant to clause (iv) of subsection (a) by deleting the consumer’s personal data retained by the
296 controller, retaining a record of the deletion request and the minimum data necessary for the
297 purpose of ensuring the consumer’s personal data remains deleted from the controller's records
298 and not using such retained data for any other purpose pursuant to this chapter.
299 (d) A controller shall establish a process for a consumer to appeal the controller’s refusal
300 to take action on a request within a reasonable period of time after the consumer’s receipt of the
301 decision. The appeal process shall be conspicuously available and similar to the process for
302 submitting requests to initiate action pursuant to this section. Not more than 60 days after receipt
303 of an appeal, the controller shall inform the consumer in writing of any action taken or not taken
304 in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decision. If the
305 appeal is denied, the controller shall also provide the consumer with an online mechanism, if
306 available, or other method through which the consumer may contact the attorney general to
307 submit a complaint.
308 (e) A controller may not condition, effectively condition, attempt to condition or attempt
309 to effectively condition the exercise of a right described in this section through the use of: (i) any
310 false, fictitious, fraudulent or materially misleading statement or representation; or (ii) dark
311 patterns or deceptive design.
15 of 33

312 (f) A controller may not collect, process or transfer personal data in a manner that
313 discriminates against, or threaten to discriminate against, an individual or class of individuals, or
314 otherwise makes unavailable the equal enjoyment of goods or services, on the basis of an
315 individual's or class of individuals’ actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, sex, sexual
316 orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, religion, genetic information,
317 pregnancy or condition related to pregnancy, status as a veteran, ancestry, national origin,
318 citizenship, immigration status or any other basis protected by chapter 151B.
319 This subsection shall not apply to: (i) the collection, processing or transfer of personal
320 data for the sole purpose of: (A) a controller self-testing to prevent or mitigate unlawful
321 discrimination or otherwise to ensure compliance with federal or state law; or (B) diversifying an
322 applicant, participant or customer pool; or (ii) a private establishment, as described in 42 USC
323 2000a(e).
324 (g) (1) A consumer shall be able to exercise rights under this section by a secure and
325 reliable means established by the controller and described to the consumer in the controller’s
326 privacy notice.
327 (2) A consumer may designate an authorized agent to exercise the rights specified in
328 clause (vi) of subsection (a). A parent or legal guardian of a child may exercise a consumer right
329 under subsections (a) and (b) on the child’s behalf. For a consumer subject to a guardianship,
330 conservatorship or other protective arrangement, the guardian or conservator of the consumer
331 may exercise a consumer right under subsections (a) and (b) on the consumer’s behalf.
16 of 33

332 (3) A controller shall comply with a request received from an authorized agent if the
333 controller is able to verify, with commercially reasonable effort, the identity of the consumer and
334 the authorized agent’s authority to act on such consumer’s behalf.
335 (4) A consumer may designate an authorized agent by technological means, including,
336 but not limited to, an internet link or a browser setting, browser extension or global device
337 setting, that indicates the consumer’s intent to opt out of processing for at least 1 of the purposes
338 specified in clause (vi) of subsection (a).
339 Section 5. (a) A controller shall:
340 (i) limit the collection of personal data to what is reasonably necessary to provide or
341 maintain a specific product or service requested by the consumer to whom the data pertains;
342 (ii) unless the controller obtains the consumer’s affirmative consent, not process personal
343 data for a purpose that is neither reasonably necessary to, nor compatible with, the disclosed
344 purposes for which the personal data is processed, as disclosed to the consumer;
345 (iii) not collect, process or transfer sensitive data concerning a consumer except when
346 such collection, processing or transfer is strictly necessary to provide or maintain a specific
347 product or service requested by the consumer to whom the sensitive data pertains;
348 (iv) not sell sensitive data;
349 (v) not transfer sensitive data concerning a consumer without obtaining the consumer’s
350 affirmative consent or, in the case of the collection or processing of personal data concerning a
351 known child, without collecting or processing such data in accordance with Children’s Online
352 Privacy Protection Act, 15 USC 6501 et seq.;
17 of 33

353 (vi) not collect or process the personal data of a consumer for purposes of targeted
354 advertising or sell the consumer’s personal data under circumstances where a controller knows or
355 should have known that the consumer is a minor;
356 (vii) establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative, technical and physical
357 data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of personal data
358 appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at issue;
359 (viii) provide an effective mechanism for a consumer that does not use dark patterns or
360 deceptive design to revoke the consumer’s affirmative consent that is at least as easy as the
361 mechanism by which the consumer provided affirmative consent and, upon revocation of such
362 affirmative consent, cease to process the data as soon as practicable, but not later than 30 days
363 after the receipt of such request, and shall immediately prevent the transfer of any sensitive data;
364 and
365 (ix) not discriminate or retaliate against, or threaten to discriminate or retaliate against, a
366 consumer for exercising any of the consumer rights contained in this chapter, including denying
367 goods or services, charging different prices or rates for goods or services or providing a different
368 level of quality of goods or services to the consumer.
369 (b) Nothing in clause (ix) of subsection (a) shall be construed to: (i) require a controller to
370 provide a product or service that requires the personal data of a consumer that the controller does
371 not collect or maintain; or (ii) prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level,
372 quality or selection of goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods or services for
373 no fee, if the offering is in connection with a consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide
374 loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts or club card program; provided, however, that the
18 of 33

375 controller shall not transfer personal data to a third party as part of such program unless the
376 transfer of personal data to the third party is clearly disclosed in the terms of the program.
377 (c) (1) A controller shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible,
378 understandable, clear, meaningful and not misleading privacy notice that includes:
379 (i) the categories of personal data collected and processed by the controller, including a
380 separate list of categories of sensitive data collected and processed by the controller, described in
381 a level of detail that provides consumers with a meaningful understanding of the type of personal
382 data collected or processed;
383 (ii) the purpose for collecting and processing each category of personal data the controller
384 collects or processes described in a way that gives consumers a meaningful understanding of
385 how each category of their personal data will be use;
386 (iii) how consumers may exercise their consumer rights, including how a consumer may
387 appeal a controller’s decision with regard to the consumer’s request;
388 (iv) the categories of personal data that the controller transfers to third parties, if any, and
389 the purposes for those transfers;
390 (v) the categories of third parties, if any, to which the controller transfers personal data;
391 (vi) an active electronic mail address or other online mechanism that the consumer may
392 use to contact the controller for privacy and data security inquiries;
393 (vii) information identifying the controller, including any business name under which the
394 controller registered with the secretary of the commonwealth and any assumed business name
395 that the controller uses in the commonwealth;
19 of 33

396 (viii) a clear and conspicuous description of any processing of personal data in which the
397 controller engages for the purposes of targeted advertising, sale of personal data to third parties
398 or profiling the consumer in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant
399 effects concerning the consumer and a procedure by which the consumer may opt out of this type
400 of processing;
401 (ix) a general description of the controller’s data security practices; and
402 (x) the effective date of the privacy notice.
403 (2)(A) The privacy notice shall be: (i) provided directly to consumers in a manner that is
404 reasonably accessible to and usable by individuals with disabilities; and (ii) made available
405 online to the general public.
406 (B) If a controller makes a material change to its privacy notice, the controller shall notify
407 each consumer affected by the material change prior to implementing the material change with
408 respect to prospectively collected personal data and provide a reasonable opportunity for each
409 consumer to withdraw affirmative consent obtained pursuant to subsection (a). A controller shall
410 provide a reasonable opportunity for each consumer to give affirmative consent to further
411 materially different processing or transfer of previously collected personal data under the
412 changed notice. The controller shall take all reasonable electronic measures to provide direct
413 notification regarding material changes to the privacy notice to each affected consumer taking
414 into account available technology and the nature of the relationship.
415 (d) If a controller sells personal data to a third party or processes personal data for
416 targeted advertising, the controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose such sales or
20 of 33

417 processing, as well as the manner in which a consumer may exercise the right to opt out of such
418 sales or processing.
419 (e) A controller shall establish, and shall describe in a privacy notice, at least 1 secure and
420 reliable means for consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer rights pursuant to
421 this chapter. Such means shall take into account the ways in which consumers normally interact
422 with the controller, the need for secure and reliable communication of such requests and the
423 ability of the controller to verify the identity of the consumer making the request. A controller
424 shall not require a consumer to create a new account in order to exercise consumer rights but
425 may require a consumer to use an existing account. The requirements of this subsection are met
426 if the controller:
427 (i) provides a clear and conspicuous link on the controller’s internet website to an internet
428 webpage that enables a consumer, or an agent of the consumer, to opt out of the targeted
429 advertising, the sale of the consumer’s personal data and profiling in furtherance of solely
430 automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer;
431 or
432 (ii) allows a consumer to opt out of any collection or processing of the consumer’s
433 personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising or any sale of the consumer’s personal data
434 through an opt-out preference signal sent, with such consumer’s affirmative consent, by a
435 platform, technology or mechanism to the controller indicating such consumer's intent to opt out
436 of any such processing or sale; provided, however, that such platform, technology or mechanism
437 shall: (A) be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the average consumer; (B) not use dark
438 patterns or deceptive design; and (C) enable the controller to reasonably determine whether the
21 of 33

439 consumer is a resident of the commonwealth and whether the consumer has made a legitimate
440 request to opt out of any sale of the consumer’s personal data or any collection or processing of
441 the consumer’s data for targeted advertising; provided further, that for purposes of this
442 subsection, the use of an internet protocol address to estimate the consumer’s location shall be
443 considered sufficient to reasonably determine residency.
444 If a consumer’s decision to opt out of any processing of the consumer’s personal data for
445 the purposes of targeted advertising or any sale of personal data through an opt-out preference
446 signal sent in accordance with this subsection conflicts with the consumer’s existing controller-
447 specific privacy setting or voluntary participation in a controller’s financial incentive program,
448 the controller shall comply with such consumer’s opt-out preference signal but may notify the
449 consumer of such conflict and provide to the consumer the choice to confirm such controller-
450 specific privacy setting or participation in such program.
451 (f) If a controller responds to a consumer opt‐out request received pursuant to subsection
452 (e) by informing the consumer of a change in the price, rate, level, quality or selection of goods
453 or services, the controller shall present the terms of any financial incentive offered pursuant to
454 subsection (b) for the processing, sale or transfer of the consumer's personal data.
455 Section 6. (a) A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a controller and shall assist
456 the controller in meeting the controller’s obligations under this chapter. Such assistance shall
457 include:
458 (i) utilizing appropriate technical and organizational measures, as far as is reasonably
459 practicable, to fulfill the controller’s obligation to respond to consumer rights requests, taking
460 into account the nature of processing and the information available to the processor;
22 of 33

461 (ii) assisting the controller in meeting the controller’s obligations in relation to the
462 security of processing personal data and in relation to the notification of a breach of security of
463 the system of the processor, taking into account the nature of processing and the information
464 available to the processor; and
465 (iii) providing necessary information to enable the controller to conduct and document
466 data protection assessments.
467 (b) A contract between a controller and a processor shall govern the processor’s data
468 processing procedures with respect to processing performed on behalf of the controller. The
469 contract shall be in writing, binding and shall include, but not be limited to, clearly set forth
470 instructions for processing data and protecting the confidentiality of the data, the nature and
471 purpose of processing, the type of data subject to processing, the duration of processing and the
472 rights and obligations of both parties including a method by which the processor shall notify the
473 controller of material changes to its privacy practices. The processor shall adhere to the
474 instructions of the controller and only process and transfer the data it receives from the controller
475 to the extent necessary to provide a service requested by the controller, as set out in the contract.
476 The contract shall also require that the processor:
477 (i) ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a duty of confidentiality
478 with respect to the data;
479 (ii) at the controller’s direction, delete or return all personal data to the controller as
480 requested, unless retention of the personal data is required by law;
23 of 33

481 (iii) upon the reasonable request of the controller, make available to the controller all
482 information in its possession necessary to demonstrate the processor’s compliance with the
483 obligations in this chapter;
484 (iv) after providing the controller an opportunity to object, engage any subcontractor
485 pursuant to a written contract that requires the subcontractor to meet the contractual, statutory
486 and regulatory obligations of the processor with respect to personal data;
487 (v) be prohibited from combining personal data that the processor receives from or on
488 behalf of a controller with personal data that the processor receives from or on behalf of another
489 person or collects from the interaction of the processor with an individual; and
490 (vi) allow, and cooperate with, reasonable assessments by the controller or the
491 controller’s designated assessor; provided, however, that the processor may arrange for a
492 qualified and independent assessor to conduct an assessment of the processor’s policies and
493 technical and organizational measures in support of the obligations under this chapter; provided
494 further, that commonly accepted industry assessment procedures for data protection are utilized
495 for any such assessments; and provided further, that the processor shall provide a report of any
496 such assessment to the controller upon request.
497 (c) A processor shall establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative,
498 technical and physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and
499 accessibility of personal data that are consistent with chapter 93H and appropriate to the volume
500 and nature of the personal data at issue.
24 of 33

501 (d) Nothing in the contract required pursuant to subsection (b) shall relieve a controller or
502 processor from the liabilities imposed on the controller or processor by virtue of such controller’s
503 or processor’s role in the processing relationship.
504 (e) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller or processor with respect to a
505 specific processing of data is a fact-based determination that depends upon the context in which
506 personal data is to be processed. A person who is not limited in such person’s processing of
507 personal data pursuant to a controller’s instructions, or who fails to adhere to such instructions, is
508 a controller and not a processor with respect to a specific processing of data. A processor that
509 continues to adhere to a controller’s instructions with respect to a specific processing of personal
510 data remains a processor. If a processor begins, alone or jointly with others, determining the
511 purposes and means of the processing of personal data, the processor is a controller with respect
512 to such processing and may be subject to an enforcement action under this chapter.
513 (f) A processor shall not process or transfer personal data on behalf of a controller if the
514 processor knows or has reason to believe that the controller has willfully disregarded or violated
515 this chapter with respect to such personal data.
516 Section 7. (a) A controller shall not conduct processing that presents a heightened risk of
517 harm to a consumer without conducting and documenting a data protection assessment for each
518 of the controller’s processing activities that presents such heightened risk of harm to a consumer.
519 For the purposes of this section, processing that presents a heightened risk of harm to a consumer
520 shall include, but not be limited to, the:
521 (i) collection or processing of personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising;
522 (ii) sale of personal data;
25 of 33

523 (iii) processing of personal data for the purposes of profiling, where such profiling
524 presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of: (A) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or unlawful
525 disparate impact on, a consumer; (B) financial, physical or reputational injury to a consumer; (C)
526 a physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion or the private affairs or concerns of a
527 consumer, where such intrusion would be offensive to a reasonable person; or (D) other
528 substantial injury to a consumer; and
529 (iv) collection or processing of sensitive data.
530 (b) Data protection assessments conducted pursuant to subsection (a) shall identify the
531 categories of personal data collected, the purposes for collecting such personal data, whether
532 personal data is being transferred and identify and weigh the benefits that may flow, directly and
533 indirectly, from the processing to the controller, the consumer, other stakeholders and the public
534 against the potential risks to the rights of the consumer associated with such processing, as
535 mitigated by safeguards that are employed by the controller to reduce such risks. The controller
536 shall factor into any such data protection assessment the use of de-identified data and the
537 reasonable expectations of consumers, as well as the context of the processing and the
538 relationship between the controller and the consumer whose personal data will be processed.
539 (c) A single data protection assessment may address a comparable set of processing
540 operations that include similar activities.
541 (d) If a controller conducts a data protection assessment for the purpose of complying
542 with another applicable law or regulation, the data protection assessment shall satisfy the
543 requirements established in this section if such data protection assessment is similar in scope and
26 of 33

544 effect to the data protection assessment that would otherwise be conducted pursuant to this
545 section.
546 (e) (1) A controller shall, upon request of the attorney general, disclose a data protection
547 assessment to the attorney general.
548 (2) The attorney general may evaluate a data protection assessment for the controller’s
549 compliance with the requirements of this chapter. A controller’s data protection assessment may
550 be used in an action to enforce this chapter.
551 (3) To the extent that any information contained in the data protection assessment
552 disclosed to the attorney general includes information subject to the attorney-client privilege or
553 work product protection, the disclosure shall not constitute a waiver of such privilege or
554 protection.
555 (4) A data protection assessment obtained by the attorney general shall be confidential
556 and shall be exempt from section 10 of chapter 66.
557 Section 8. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to: (i) require a controller or
558 processor to re-identify de-identified data; (ii) maintain data in identifiable form or collect,
559 obtain, retain or access any data or technology in order to be capable of associating an
560 authenticated consumer request with personal data; or (iii) require a controller or processor to
561 comply with an authenticated consumer rights request if the controller: (A) is not reasonably
562 capable of associating the request with the personal data or it would be unreasonably
563 burdensome for the controller to associate the request with the personal data; and (B) does not
564 use the personal data to recognize or respond to the specific consumer who is the subject of the
27 of 33

565 personal data or associate the personal data with other personal data about the same specific
566 consumer.
567 (b) A controller that transfers de-identified data shall exercise reasonable oversight to
568 monitor compliance with any contractual commitments to which the de-identified data is subject
569 and shall take appropriate steps to address any breaches of those contractual commitments.
570 Section 9. (a). Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict a controller’s or
571 processor’s ability to:
572 (i) comply with federal law or other laws of the commonwealth;
573 (ii) comply with a civil, criminal or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena or
574 summons by federal, state, municipal or other governmental authorities;
575 (iii) cooperate with a federal law enforcement agency or any law enforcement agency of
576 the commonwealth concerning conduct or activity that the controller or processor reasonably and
577 in good faith believes may violate federal or state law;
578 (iv) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for or defend legal claims;
579 (v) provide a product or service specifically requested by the consumer;
580 (vi) perform under a contract to which a consumer is a party, including fulfilling the
581 terms of a written warranty;
582 (vii) take steps at the request of a consumer prior to entering into a contract;
28 of 33

583 (viii) take immediate steps to protect an interest that is essential for the life or physical
584 safety of the consumer or another individual and where the processing cannot be manifestly
585 based on another legal basis;
586 (ix) prevent, detect, protect against, investigate, prosecute those responsible for or
587 otherwise respond to security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive
588 activities or any other type of illegal activity;
589 (x) preserve the integrity or security of systems;
590 (xi) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical or statistical research in the
591 public interest that adheres to all relevant laws and regulations governing such research, if
592 applicable, and is approved, monitored and governed by an institutional review board or similar
593 independent oversight entity that determines whether the: (A) deletion of personal data requested
594 by a consumer under clause (iv) of subsection (a) of section 4 is likely to provide substantial
595 benefits that do not accrue exclusively to the controller; (B) expected benefits of the research
596 outweigh the privacy risks; and (C) controller has implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate
597 privacy risks associated with the research, including any risks associated with re-identification;
598 (xii) assist another controller, processor or third party with any of the obligations under
599 this chapter;
600 (xiii) process personal data for reasons of public interest in the area of public health,
601 community health or population health solely to the extent that such processing is: (A) subject to
602 suitable and specific measures to safeguard the rights of the consumer whose personal data is
603 being processed; and (B) under the responsibility of a professional subject to confidentiality
604 obligations under federal, state or local law;
29 of 33

605 (xiv) ensure the security and integrity of personal data as required by this chapter, protect
606 against spam or protect and maintain networks and systems, including through diagnostics,
607 debugging and repairs;
608 (xv) effectuate a product recall pursuant to federal or state law or fulfill a warranty; and
609 (xvi) publish entity-based member or employee contact information where such
610 publication is intended to allow members of the public to contact such member or employee in
611 the ordinary course of the entity’s operations.
612 (b) (1) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors under this chapter shall not
613 apply where compliance by the controller or processor with said sections would violate an
614 evidentiary privilege.
615 (2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a controller or processor from
616 providing personal data concerning a consumer to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege
617 under the laws of the commonwealth as part of a privileged communication.
618 (c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
619 (i) impose any obligation on a controller or processor that adversely affects the rights or
620 freedoms of any person, including, but not limited to, freedom of speech and freedom of the
621 press guaranteed in the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and Article XVI of
622 the Constitution of the Commonwealth;
623 (ii) apply to any person’s collection or processing of personal data in the course of such
624 person’s personal or household activities;
30 of 33

625 (iii) for private schools approved under section 1 of chapter 76 and private institutions of
626 higher education as defined by 20 USC section 1001 et seq., require deletion of personal data
627 that would unreasonably interfere with the provision of education services by or the ordinary
628 operation of the school or institution; or
629 (iv) for a consumer reporting agency, as defined in 15 USC 1681a(f), require deletion of
630 personal data used for the purpose of evaluating a consumer’s creditworthiness, credit standing,
631 credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of living, subject
632 to the provisions of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq.
633 (d) (1) Personal data collected or processed by a controller pursuant to this section may
634 be collected or processed to the extent that such collection and processing is: (i) reasonably
635 necessary to effectuate the purposes listed in this section; (ii) limited to what is necessary in
636 relation to the specific purposes listed in this section; and (iii) compliant with subsection (f) of
637 section 4.
638 (2) Personal data processed pursuant to subsection (a) shall, where applicable, take into
639 account the nature and purpose or purposes of such processing. Such data shall be subject to
640 reasonable administrative, technical and physical measures to protect the confidentiality,
641 integrity and accessibility of the personal data and to reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm
642 to consumers relating to such processing of personal data.
643 (e) If a controller collects or processes personal data pursuant to an exemption in this
644 section, the controller bears the burden of demonstrating that such collection or processing
645 qualifies for the exemption and complies with the requirements in this subsection.
31 of 33

646 Section 10. (a) The attorney general may adopt, amend or rescind rules and regulations
647 for the implementation, administration and enforcement of this chapter.
648 (b) A violation of this chapter shall constitute an unfair or deceptive trade practice for
649 purposes of chapter 93A. Notwithstanding sections 9 and 11 of said chapter 93A, the attorney
650 general shall have exclusive authority to bring a civil action against a controller or processor that
651 violates this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter to:
652 (i) enjoin an act or practice that is in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted
653 under this chapter, including an order that an entity retrieve any personal data transferred in such
654 violation;
655 (ii) enforce compliance with this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter,
656 including seeking declaratory relief;
657 (iii) obtain damages, including punitive damages, restitution of any money or property
658 obtained directly or indirectly by any such violation, and disgorgement of any profits, assets,
659 property, or data obtained directly or indirectly by any such violation on behalf of the residents
660 of the commonwealth;
661 (iv) impose civil penalties in an amount not more than $5,000 per violation;
662 (v) obtain investigative costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs,
663 including, but not limited to, expert fees, reasonably incurred; and
664 (vi) obtain any such other and further relief as the court may deem proper.
665 (c) The attorney general shall create, maintain and monitor a mechanism for consumers to
666 report potential violations of this chapter.
32 of 33

667 (d) (1) Prior to initiating any action for a violation of any provision this chapter, the
668 attorney general shall issue a notice of violation to the controller unless the attorney general
669 determines that a cure is not possible or an alleged violation requires immediate enforcement. If
670 the controller fails to cure such violation not more than 60 days after receipt of the notice of
671 violation, the attorney general may bring an action pursuant to this section.
672 (2) In determining whether an alleged violation requires immediate enforcement, the
673 attorney general may consider: (i) the number of violations; (ii) the size and complexity of the
674 controller or processor; (iii) the nature and extent of the controller’s or processor’s processing
675 activities; (iv) the likelihood of injury to the public; (v) the safety of persons or property; (vi)
676 whether the alleged violation was likely caused by a human or technical error; and (vii) the
677 extent to which the controller or processor has violated this subtitle or similar laws in the past.
678 SECTION 2. Subsection (d) of section 10 of chapter 93M of the General Laws is hereby
679 repealed.
680 SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
681 SECTION 4. Section 2 shall take effect on June 1, 2027.
33 of 33